Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5445XS (4) 91 lh/jh S.F. 2128 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 686E.1 Failure to secure a firearm 1 ââ private cause of action. 2 1. If an owner of a firearm fails to secure the 3 firearm against theft, or against the acquisition or use 4 by an unauthorized person, and as a result the firearm is 5 subsequently used in the commission of a criminal offense by 6 a third party, any person harmed by that criminal offense, 7 including physical injuries, emotional distress, or property 8 damage, may bring a civil action against the owner of the 9 firearm. 10 2. It shall be an affirmative defense to a civil action 11 brought under this section that the firearm was stolen if the 12 firearm owner reported the theft to law enforcement prior to 13 the commission of the criminal offense which is the basis for 14 the action. 15 3. In a civil action brought under this section, the court 16 may award the prevailing party court costs and reasonable 17 attorney fees. 18 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to causes of action 19 that arise on or after July 1, 2026. 20